Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1433.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 11, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-106.01, to read: START_STATUTE11-106.01. Gila county Notwithstanding section 11-106, Gila county is bounded as follows: commencing at the eastern point where the boundary of Maricopa county intersects with the boundary of Gila county and the boundary of Pinal county; thence west to the southeastern point where the boundary of Maricopa county and the boundary of Pinal county meet; thence south to the point where the boundary of the city of Mesa meets the boundary of Pinal county; thence west along the boundary of the city of Mesa until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Tempe; thence west following the boundary of the city of Tempe until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Scottsdale; thence westward along the boundary of the city of Scottsdale until it intersects with the boundary of the town of Paradise Valley; thence west following the boundary of the town of Paradise Valley until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Scottsdale; thence northward along the boundary of the city of Scottsdale until it intersects with the boundary of the town of Cave Creek; thence following the boundary of the town of Cave Creek west until the northwestern corner of the town of Cave Creek; thence westward to a point perpendicular to north seventh street; thence northward parallel to north seventh street until intersecting with the boundary of Yavapai county; thence east to the intersection of the boundary of Yavapai county and the boundary of Gila county. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 11-109, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE11-109. Maricopa county Maricopa county, the county seat of which is Phoenix, is bounded as follows: Commencing at a point where the meridian line one hundred thirteen degrees twenty minutes west longitude, as defined by the Atwood survey of 1918, intersects the second standard parallel south, being the northwest corner of Pima county; thence north on such survey line and along the east boundaries of Yuma and La Paz counties to the point where the meridian line one hundred thirteen degrees twenty minutes west longitude, as surveyed, intersects the thirty-fourth parallel north latitude, as defined by the Thompson survey of 1924; thence east on the thirty-fourth parallel north latitude, as defined, and along the southern boundary of Yavapai county to the point where the Hassayampa river intersects such parallel; thence southeast in a direct line following the Thompson survey of 1924 to a point in the Agua Fria river two miles southerly and below the mouth of Humbug creek; thence northerly up the Agua Fria river to a point two miles southerly and below the place where the residence of J. W. Swilling stood on January 31, 1877; thence easterly in a direct line following the Thompson survey of 1924 to the point where the thirty-fourth parallel north latitude, as defined by such survey, intersects the Verde river; thence east on such parallel to the point where the parallel as surveyed intersects the summit of the Mazatzal range of mountains; thence southerly along the summit of the Mazatzal range of mountains to the point where such range of mountains intersects the centerline of the Salt river; thence easterly up the Salt river to the mouth of Tonto creek; thence southerly in a direct line toward a mountain known as the "Water Shed," and along the western boundary of Gila county to the point where such line and boundary intersects the north line of township one north; thence west on the north line of township one north and along the northern boundary of Pinal county to the point where such line intersects the eastern line of range seven east; thence south on the eastern line of range seven east to the point where such line intersects the southern line of township two south; thence west on such line to the point where such line intersects the Gila river; thence northerly and westerly down the Gila river to the point where the river intersects the eastern line of range one east, being the northwest corner of Pinal county; thence south on such line to the point where such line intersects the second standard parallel south, being the southwest corner of Pinal county; thence west on such parallel to the point where it intersects the meridian line one hundred thirteen degrees twenty minutes west longitude, as defined by the Atwood survey of 1918, being the place of beginning. Commencing at the point where interstate ten intersects the boundary of Pinal county; thence west along the boundary of Pinal county until it intersects with a point perpendicular to west ocotillo road; thence west until the southwestern corner of the Gila River Indian community; thence north to the boundary of the city of Avondale; thence following the boundary of the city of Avondale north until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Litchfield Park; thence north along the eastern boundary of the city of Litchfield Park until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Glendale; thence following the boundary of the city of Glendale east until the intersection of forty-third avenue; thence north along the eastern boundary of the city of Glendale until it intersects with bell road; thence east along bell road until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Scottsdale; thence following the boundary of the city of Scottsdale south until it intersects with the boundary of the town of Paradise Valley; thence west following the boundary of the town of Paradise Valley until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Scottsdale; thence following the boundary of the city of Scottsdale until it intersects with the Salt River Pima-Maricopa Indian reservation; thence following south along the boundary of the city of Tempe until it intersects with United States route sixty; thence following United States route sixty west until it intersects with interstate ten; thence following interstate ten south until it intersects with the boundary of the town of Guadalupe; thence east following the boundary of town of Guadalupe until it intersects with interstate ten; thence following interstate ten south until it intersects with the boundary of Pinal county. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Title 11, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 11-113.01, 11-115.01, 11-116.01 and 11-117.01, to read: START_STATUTE11-113.01. Pinal county Notwithstanding section 11-113, Pinal county is bounded as follows: commencing where interstate ten intersects with the boundary of Pinal county; thence north following interstate ten until it intersects with the boundary of the town of Guadalupe; thence following the eastern boundary of the town of Guadalupe until it intersects with interstate ten; thence following interstate ten until it intersects with united states highway sixty; thence east along United States highway sixty until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Mesa; thence continuing east along the boundary of the city of Mesa until it intersects with the boundary of Pinal county. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE11-115.01. Yavapai county Notwithstanding section 11-115, Yavapai county is bounded as follows: commencing at the corner where the boundary of Yavapai county, the boundary of La Paz county and the boundary of Maricopa county intersect; thence south to the point where interstate ten intersects the boundary of La Paz county; thence east along interstate ten until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Buckeye; thence north following the boundary of the city of buckeye until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Litchfield Park; thence east along the boundary of the city of Litchfield Park until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Phoenix; thence east along the boundary of the city of Phoenix until it intersects with forty-third avenue; thence north along the boundary of the city of Glendale until it intersects with bell road; thence east along bell road until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Scottsdale; thence north along the boundary of the city of Scottsdale until it intersects with the boundary of the town of Cave Creek; thence west following the boundary of the town of Cave Creek to the northwest corner; thence west until perpendicular to north seventh street; thence north until it intersects with the boundary of Yavapai county. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE11-116.01. Yuma county Notwithstanding section 11-116, Yuma county is bounded as follows: commencing at the point where interstate eight intersects the boundary of Yuma county; thence east until the point where interstate eight intersects Painter Rock Dam road; thence north from the point where interstate eight intersects Painter Rock Dam road until the intersection with the boundary of the Gila River; thence following the boundary of the Gila River east until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Buckeye; thence east following the boundary of the city of Buckeye until it intersects with a point parallel to west Patterson road; thence east until the boundary of the city of Goodyear; thence east following the boundary of the city of Goodyear until it intersects with the boundary of Pinal county; thence south following along of the boundary of Pinal county until it intersects with the boundary of Pima county; thence following west along the boundary of Pima county until it intersects with the boundary of Yuma county. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE11-117.01. La Paz county Notwithstanding section 11-117, La Paz county is bounded as follows: commencing at the point where the boundary of La Paz county, the boundary of Yuma county and the boundary of Maricopa county intersect; thence north until the point where interstate ten intersects with the boundary of La Paz county; thence east along interstate ten until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Buckeye; thence north along the boundary of the city of Buckeye until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Goodyear; thence east along the boundary of the city of Goodyear until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Litchfield; thence east along the boundary of the city of Litchfield Park until it intersects with the boundary of the city of Avondale; thence south along the boundary of the city of Avondale until it intersects with the Gila River Indian community; thence south following the boundary of the Gila River Indian community until it intersects with Pinal county; thence south until a point perpendicular to Schumacher lane; thence following the boundary of the city of Goodyear west until it intersects with the boundary of Buckeye; thence following west along the boundary of the city of Buckeye until it intersects with the boundary of the Gila River; thence following the boundary of the Gila River south until a point directly north of the point where interstate eight intersects Painter Rock Dam road; thence south until intersecting interstate eight; thence east along interstate eight until it intersects with the boundary of Yuma county. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Conforming legislation The legislative council staff shall prepare proposed legislation conforming the Arizona Revised Statutes to the provisions of this act for consideration in the fifty-eighth legislature, first regular session. Sec. 5. Effective date This act is effective from and after December 31, 2026.